Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2654.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1901(c) introductory paragraph and (d)(2) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, amended July 15, 2024 (P.L.737, No.60), are amended, subsection (c) is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1901. Exemption of persons, entities and vehicles from fees.* * *(c) Processing fee in lieu of registration fee.--No registration fee shall be charged for vehicles registered by any of the following but the department shall charge a fee of [$10] $11 to cover the costs of processing for issuing or renewing the registration:* * *123456789101112131415161718 (24) Any person who is a volunteer for a volunteer fire company or nonprofit emergency medical services agency.(d) Limitations.--* * *(2) Only one passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 9,000 pounds may be registered to any person under the provisions of subsection (b)(4), (6), (7) and (8) and subsection (c)(16) and (24).* * *(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Nonprofit emergency medical services agency." An emergency medical services agency as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 8103 (relating to definitions) and chartered as a nonprofit corporation within this Commonwealth."Volunteer." A member of a volunteer fire company or a nonprofit emergency medical services agency."Volunteer fire company." A nonprofit chartered corporation, association or organization located in this Commonwealth that provides fire protection services and may offer other voluntary emergency services within this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2654PN3665 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223